en: whole grain khorasan flour, whole grain kamut flour
de: Khorasan Vollkornmehl, Kamut-Khorasan Vollkornmehl
fr: farine de kamut complète
hr: khorasan brašno od cijelog zrna
it: farina integrale di kamut, farina integrale di grano kamut, farina integrale di grano khorasan kamut

en: teff
xx: teff
de: Teff
pl: teff, miłka abisyńska, tef, trawa abisyńska

en: teff seed
de: Teffsamen
es: semilla de teff
hr: teff sjeme
it: semi di teff

en: whole grain teff seed, whole grain teff
de: Vollkorn-Teffsamen, Teff-Vollkornsamen
hr: teff sjeme cijelog zrna
it: semi di teff integrali

en: teff flour
de: teffmehl
es: harina de teff
fr: farine de teff
hr: teff brašno
it: farina di teff
nl: teffmeel
sv: teffmjöl

en: whole grain teff flour, whole teff flour
de: Teffvollkornmehl, Teff-Vollkornmehl
hr: teff brašno od cijelog zrna
it: farina di teff integrale

en: ivory teff flour
de: Elfenbein Teff-Mehl, Elfenbein Teffmehl
hr: ivory teff brašno
it: farina di teff avorio

en: whole grain ivory teff flour
de: Ivory-Teffvollkornmehl
hr: cjelovito zrno ivory teff brašno
it: farina integrale di teff avorio

en: whole spelt and wheat kernels
da: fuldkornsspelt- og hvedekerner
sv: fullkornskärnor av dinkelvete och vete

en: barley and wheat malt
sv: malt av korn och vete

en: flour
af: meel
ak: Esam
ar: طحين
ay: Aku
az: un
ba: он
be: мука
bg: брашно, брашна
bm: farinimugu
bn: আটা
br: bleud
ca: farina
co: farina
cs: mouka
cv: çăнăх
cy: blawd
da: mel
de: Mehl
el: αλεύρι
eo: faruno
es: harina
et: jahu
eu: irin
fa: آرد
fi: jauho, jauhot
fo: mjøl
fr: farine, farines
fy: moal
ga: plúr
gl: fariña
gu: આટો
he: קמח
hi: आटा
hr: brašno
ht: farin
hu: liszt
hy: ալյուր
id: tepung
ik: Palauvak
io: farino
is: mjöl
it: farina
iu: ᐸᓚᐅᒑᖅ
ja: 穀粉
jv: glepung
ka: ფქვილი
kk: ұн
km: ម្សៅ
kn: ಹಿಟ್ಟು
ko: 밀가루
ku: ar
ky: ун
la: Farina
lb: Miel
li: mael
ln: falíni
lo: ແປ້ງ
lt: miltai
lv: milti
mg: koba
mk: брашно
ml: മാവു
mn: гурил
mr: पीठ
ms: tepung
mt: dqiq
my: မှုန့်
nb: mel
ne: पिठो
nl: meel, bloem
nn: mjøl
no: mel, mjøl
nv: Akʼáán
oc: farina
or: ଅଟା
os: Ссад
pa: ਆਟਾ
pl: mąka, mąki
pt: farinha
qu: Hak'u
rm: farina
ro: făină
ru: мука
rw: fu
si: පිටි
sk: múka
sl: moka
so: Bur
sq: mielli
sr: брашно
sv: mjöl
sw: unga
ta: மாவு
te: పిండి
tg: орд
th: แป้งประกอบอาหาร
tk: un
tl: arina
tr: un
tt: он
ug: ئۇن
uk: борошно
ur: آٹا
uz: Un
vi: bột
wa: farene
wo: sunguf
yi: מעל
zh: 麵粉

en: flour blend, flour mix
bg: смес от брашна
de: mehlmischung
es: mezcla de harinas
fi: jauhoseos
fr: mélange de farine
hr: mješavina brašna
it: Miscela di farina
sv: mjölblanding, mjölmix, brödmix

en: whole grain flour blend
hr: mješavina brašna od cjelovitog zrna
it: miscela di farine integrali

en: cereal flour
af: graanmeel
al: miell drithërash
ar: دقيق الحبوب
az: dənli bitkilər unu
bg: брашно от зърнени култури
ca: farina de cereal
cs: obilná mouka
da: kornmel
de: Getreidemehl, Getreidemehle
el: αλεύρι δημητριακών
es: harina de cereales
et: teraviljajahu
eu: zereal-irina
fi: viljajauho
fr: farine de céréales, farines de céréales
ga: plúr gránach
gl: fariña de cereais
he: קמח דגנים
hr: brašno žitarica
hu: gabonaliszt
hy: հացահատիկի ալյուր
id: tepung sereal
is: kornmjöl
it: farine di cereali
ja: 穀物粉
kk: жарма ұны
ko: 곡물 가루
lt: grūdų miltai
lv: graudu milti
mk: брашно од житарки
ms: tepung bijirin
nl: granenmeel
pl: Mąka zbożowa
pt: Farinha de cereais
ro: Făină din cereale
ru: зерновая мука
sk: obilná múka
sl: žitna moka
sq: miell drithërash
sr: брашно од житарица
sv: spannmålsmjöl
th: แป้งธัญพืช
tr: tahıl unu
uk: борошно зернове
ur: اناج کا آٹا
vi: bột ngũ cốc
zh: 谷物粉

en: mixed cereal flour, mixed cereal flours
fr: farine multicéréales, farines multicéréales
hr: brašno od miješanih žitarica
it: farina di cereali misti

en: malt flour
bg: брашно от малц, малцово брашно
da: maltet mel
de: Malzmehl
es: harina de malta
fi: mallasjauho, mallastettu sekaviljajauho
fr: farine de malt
hr: sladno brašno
it: Farina di malto
pt: farinha de malte, farinha de malte de cereais
sv: maltmjöl

en: wheat flour, wheatflour
ar: طحين القمح
bg: пшенично брашно, пшеничено брашно
bs: pšenično brašno
ca: Farina de ble
cs: pšeničná mouka
da: Hvedemel, hved mel
de: Weizenmehl, Weizen-mehl, Weizenmehl Typ 1050, Weizenmehl Typ 550, Weizenmehl Typ 405
el: αλεύρι σίτου
es: harina de trigo, harina de trigo blando
et: nisujahu
eu: Gari-irin
fa: آرد گندم
fi: vehnäjauho, vehnäjauhoa
fr: farine de blé, farines de blé, farine de froment
he: קמח חיטה
hr: pšenično bijelo brašno, pšenično brašno, pšenicno brašno
hu: búzaliszt
is: hveitimjöl
it: farina di frumento, farina di grano
ja: 小麦粉
lt: kviečių, kviečių miltai, kvietiniai, kvietiniai miltai, kvietinės, kvietinės miltai, kvietinis, kvietinis miltai
lv: kviešu milti
mr: कणीक
ms: Tepung gandum
nb: hvetemel
nl: tarwemeel, tarwebloem, tarwe bloem
nn: hvetemel
no: hvetemel
pl: mąka pszenna, mąka z pszenicy zwyczajnej
pt: farinha de trigo
ro: făină de grâu, fäină de grâu, faina de grau, făină din grâu, faina din grau, făină de grâu albă
ru: Пшеничная мука, мука пшеничная хлебопекарная высшего сорта, мука пшеничная высшего сорта, мука пшеничная, мука пшеничная хлебопекарная первого сорта, мука пшеничная хлебопекарная высший сорт, мука пшеничная хлебопекарная второго сорта, мука пшеничная 1 сорта, мука пшеничная первого сорта, мука пшеничная хлебопекарная первый сорт, мука пшеничная общего назначения
sa: गोधूमपिष्टम्
sk: pšeničná múka, pšeničná mouka
sl: psenicna moka, pšenična moka
sq: pšenično brašno
sv: vetemjöl, vete mjöl
th: แป้งสาลี
tr: buğday unu
uk: Борошно пшеничне
vi: Bột mì
zh: 小麥麵粉

en: malted wheat flour, wheat malt flour
bg: пшенично малцово брашно, малцово пшенично брашно, брашно от пшеничен малц
ca: farina de blat maltejada
da: hvedemaltmel
de: gemaltzen Weizenmehl, Weizenmalzmehl, Weizenrostmalzmehl
es: harina de trigo malteada, harina de malta de trigo
fi: vehnämallasjauho, mallastettu vehnäjauho
fr: farine de blé maltée, farine de blé fermenté, farine de blé malté, farine de malt de froment
hr: pšenično sladno brašno, pšenično sladno brašno od cjelovitog zrna
hu: búzamaláta liszt
it: farina di grano maltato, farina di malto di frumento
lt: salykliniai kviečių miltai, salykliniai kvietiniai miltai, salykliniai kvietinės miltai, salykliniai kvietinis miltai
lv: iesala kviešu milti
nl: gemout tarwemeel, tarwemoutmeel, tarwemoutbloem
pl: mąka słodowa pszenna, mąka pszenna słodowana, mąka pszenna słodowa, mąka ze słodu pszennego
pt: farinha de malte de trigo
sv: vetemaltmjöl

en: caramelized malted wheat flour
de: karamellisiertes Weizenmalzmehl, Weizenmalzmehl karamellisiert
fi: karamellisoitu vehnämallasjauho
hr: karamelizirano pšenično brašno od slada
it: farina di grano maltato caramellato, farina di malto di frumento caramellato
sv: karamelliserat vetemaltmjöl

bg: пшенично брашно тип 450
fr: farine de blé type 45, farine de blé t45
pl: mąka pszenna typ 450, mąka pszenna 450, mąka pszenna tortowa typ 450, mąka pszenna tortowa